Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF740.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.70, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Animal shelters. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, the term "animal shelter" means a nonprofit organization engaged in the business of rescuing, sheltering, and finding homes for unwanted animals. new text end new text begin (b) Purchases made by an animal shelter are exempt if the purchases are used directly in the activities of rescuing, sheltering, and finding homes for unwanted animals. The exemption under this paragraph does not apply to the following purchases: new text end new text begin (1) building, construction, or reconstruction materials purchased by a contractor or a subcontractor as a part of a lump-sum contract or similar type of contract with a guaranteed maximum price covering both labor and materials for use in the construction, alteration, or repair of a building or facility; new text end new text begin (2) construction materials purchased by an animal shelter or their contractors to be used in constructing buildings or facilities that will not be used principally by the tax-exempt entities; new text end new text begin (3) lodging as defined under section 297A.61, subdivision 3, paragraph (g), clause (2), and prepared food, candy, soft drinks, and alcoholic beverages as defined in section 297A.67, subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (4) leasing of a motor vehicle as defined in section 297B.01, subdivision 11. new text end new text begin (c) The sale or adoption of unwanted animals by an animal shelter and the sale of associated animal supplies and equipment by an animal shelter are exempt. new text end new text begin (d) Sales made by and events run by an animal shelter for fundraising purposes are exempt. Exempt sales include the sale of prepared food, candy, and soft drinks at a fundraising event. The exemption under this paragraph is subject to the following limits: new text end new text begin (1) gross receipts from all fundraising sales are taxable if the total fundraising by the animal shelter exceeds 24 days per year; new text end new text begin (2) it does not apply to fundraising events conducted on premises leased for more than five days but less than 30 days; and new text end new text begin (3) it does not apply to admission charges for events involving bingo or other gambling activities or to charges for use of amusement devices involving bingo or other gambling activities. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end